Hawaii statutes.
§665-2 Conclusive presumptions. In all
actions provided for in section 665-1, the following shall be conclusive
presumptions of fact:

(1) That the person who last owned the property has
died intestate, if it is shown that the owner has been absent from the State
and not been heard of for the space of fifteen years, and has neither in person
nor through any agent thereto authorized in writing, nor through any tenant
occupying the premises in question under a valid lease, had possession or
exercised dominion over the premises during that time, and that no application
for letters testamentary or of administration has been filed in any court
within the State having jurisdiction of probate proceedings within such time.

(2) That the person who last owned the property has
left no kindred, if it is shown that no person claiming to be kin has made
claim to the property within five years after the lapse of the fifteen years in
this section before mentioned. [L 1886, c 8, §2; RL 1925, §2914; RL 1935,
§4231; RL 1945, §10242; RL 1955, §235-2; HRS §665-2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next